Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-106
Governing law.

(ULLCA 106) The law of this state governs:

(1) the internal affairs
of a limited liability company; and

(2) the liability of a member as member and a manager
as manager for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability
company.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 6.